North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 6. Uniform Common Trust Fund Act. [Repealed]

§§ 36A-90 through 36A-94.
[Repealed]

Recodified as §§ 53-163.5 through 53-163.9 by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Editor’s Note.

Prior to recodification of this Article, G.S. 36A-95 through 36A-99 had been set out as reserved for future codification purposes.